Hawaii statutes.
§1-29 Computation of time. The time in
which any act provided by law is to be done is computed by excluding the first
day and including the last, unless the last day is a Sunday or holiday and then
it is also excluded. When so provided by the rules of court, the last day also
shall be excluded if it is a Saturday. [L 1923, c 3, §1; RL 1925, §19; RL 1935,
§20; RL 1945, §20; RL 1955, §1-40; HRS §1-29; am L 1973, c 31, §2]

Cross References

Holidays, see §§8-1 to 8-3.

"Month", "year" defined, see §1-20.

"Successive" weeks, see §601-13.

Rules of Court

Computation of time, see DCRCP rule 6; HCTR rule 21; HFCR
rule 6; HPR rule 10; HRAP rule 26(a); HRCP rule 6(a); HRPP rule 45(a).

Attorney General Opinions

Section refers to calculation of time in terms of days rather
than hours. Att. Gen. Op. 92-6.

Case Notes

Where act to be done a specified period before a certain
event, how computed. 8 H. 602; 8 H. 735, 738 (single justice); 19 H. 225
(prior to statutory exclusion of Sunday).

Statute applied: 10 H. 249; 18 H. 7; 24 H. 250 (district
court proceeding at time when statute applicable only to circuit court
proceedings); 38 H. 443. Not applicable where time was fixed by the judge. 28
H. 455 (Prior to adoption of present rules of court).

Publication "for not less than ten days" before
letting contract not satisfied by one publication more than ten days prior. 30
H. 94.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next